Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 17
COUNTY ASSISTANCE FOR THE POOR

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 10 of chapter 36, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1981, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1981, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL ASSISTANCE

PART 2 COUNTY JOB DIVERSION PROGRAM

PART 3 JOB ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM

PART 4 INTERNSHIP PROGRAM FOR
UNEMPLOYMENT CLAIMANTS